sv: Reningsfokus: Tjocktarmsrengöring; Matsmältningsrengöring; Vätskedrivande rengöring; Helkroppsavgiftning; Njurrengöring; Leverrengöring; Övrigt
hr-HR: Fokus čišćenja: Čišćenje debelog crijeva; Čišćenje probave; Diuretsko čišćenje; Detoksikacija cijelog tijela; Čišćenje bubrega; Čišćenje jetre; Ostalo
it: Focus della depurazione: Pulizia del colon; Pulizia digestiva; Pulizia diuretica; Detox totale del corpo; Pulizia renale; Pulizia epatica; Altro
hu: Tisztítókúra-fókusz: Béltisztítás; Emésztőrendszer tisztítás; Vizelethajtó tisztítás; Teljes test méregtelenítés; Vesetisztítás; Májtisztítás; Egyéb
pl: Obszar działania oczyszczania: Oczyszczanie jelita grubego; Oczyszczanie układu trawiennego; Oczyszczanie moczopędne; Detoksykacja całego ciała; Oczyszczanie nerek; Oczyszczanie wątroby; Inne
fi: Puhdistuksen painopiste: Suolen puhdistus; Ruoansulatuksen puhdistus; Nestettä poistava puhdistus; Koko kehon puhdistus; Munuaisten puhdistus; Maksan puhdistus; Muu
cs: Zaměření detoxu: Očista střev; Trávicí očista; Diuretická očista; Celková detoxikace těla; Očista ledvin; Očista jater; Jiné
es: Enfoque de limpieza: Limpieza de colon; Limpieza digestiva; Limpieza diurética; Desintoxicación de cuerpo completo; Limpieza renal; Limpieza hepática; Otros
bg-BG: Фокус на почистването: Почистване на дебелото черво; Храносмилателно почистване; Диуретично почистване; Пълна детоксикация на тялото; Почистване на бъбреците; Почистване на черния дроб; Други
fr: Objectif de la cure détox: Nettoyage du côlon; Nettoyage digestif; Nettoyage diurétique; Détoxification complète du corps; Nettoyage des reins; Nettoyage du foie; Autre
da: Udrensningsfokus: Tyktarmsudrensning; Fordøjelsesudrensning; Vanddrivende udrensning; Fuld kropsdetox; Nyreudrensning; Leverudrensning; Andet
ja: クレンズ焦点: 腸内洗浄; 消化器系クレンズ; 利尿クレンズ; 全身デトックス; 腎臓クレンズ; 肝臓クレンズ; その他
nb: Rensefokus: Tarmrens; Fordøyelsesrens; Vanndrivende rens; Helkroppsavgiftning; Nyrerens; Leverrens; Annet
pt-BR: Foco da limpeza: Limpeza de cólon; Limpeza digestiva; Limpeza diurética; Desintoxicação corporal completa; Limpeza renal; Limpeza hepática; Outro
sl-SI: Fokus čiščenja: Čiščenje črevesja; Prebavno čiščenje; Diuretično čiščenje; Razstrupljanje celotnega telesa; Čiščenje ledvic; Čiščenje jeter; Drugo
el: Εστίαση καθαρισμού: Καθαρισμός παχέος εντέρου; Πεπτικός καθαρισμός; Διουρητικός καθαρισμός; Πλήρης αποτοξίνωση σώματος; Νεφρικός καθαρισμός; Ηπατικός καθαρισμός; Άλλο
zh-TW: 淨化重點: 結腸清潔; 消化清潔; 利尿清潔; 全身排毒; 腎臟清潔; 肝臟清潔; 其他
de: Reinigungsfokus: Darmreinigung; Verdauungsreinigung; Diuretische Reinigung; Ganzkörperentgiftung; Nierenreinigung; Leberreinigung; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Focusul curățării: Curățare de colon; Curățare digestivă; Curățare diuretică; Detoxifiere completă; Curățare renală; Curățare hepatică; Altele
en: Cleanse focus: Colon cleanse; Digestive cleanse; Diuretic cleanse; Full body detox; Kidney cleanse; Liver cleanse; Other
nl: Reinigingsfocus: Darmreiniging; Spijsverteringsreiniging; Diuretische reiniging; Volledige lichaamsdetox; Nierreiniging; Leverreiniging; Andere
pt-PT: Foco da desintoxicação: Limpeza do cólon; Limpeza digestiva; Limpeza diurética; Desintoxicação corporal total; Limpeza renal; Limpeza hepática; Outro
sk-SK: Zameranie detoxu: Čistenie hrubého čreva; Čistenie tráviaceho systému; Diuretické čistenie; Celková detoxikácia tela; Čistenie obličiek; Čistenie pečene; Iné
th: จุดเน้นการล้างพิษ: ล้างลำไส้ใหญ่; ล้างระบบย่อยอาหาร; ล้างระบบขับถ่าย; ล้างพิษทั้งร่างกาย; ล้างไต; ล้างตับ; อื่นๆ
vi: Trọng tâm thanh lọc: Làm sạch ruột già; Làm sạch tiêu hóa; Làm sạch lợi tiểu; Giải độc toàn thân; Làm sạch thận; Làm sạch gan; Khác
lt-LT: Valymo kryptis: Storosios žarnos valymas; Virškinimo sistemos valymas; Diuretinis valymas; Viso kūno detoksikacija; Inkstų valymas; Kepenų valymas; Kita
ko: 클렌즈 초점: 대장 정화; 소화기 정화; 이뇨 정화; 전신 디톡스; 신장 정화; 간 정화; 기타
tr: Arınma odağı: Kolon temizliği; Sindirim temizliği; İdrar söktürücü temizlik; Tüm vücut detoksu; Böbrek temizliği; Karaciğer temizliği; Diğer
zh-CN: 清洁重点: 肠道清洁; 消化清洁; 利尿清洁; 全身排毒; 肾脏清洁; 肝脏清洁; 其他
ru: Направленность очищения: Очищение кишечника; Очищение пищеварительной системы; Мочегонное очищение; Детоксикация всего тела; Очищение почек; Очищение печени; Другой